Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1262
Races and exhibitions; commission authorization.

The commission may authorize the holding of regattas, motorboat or other boat races, marine parades, tournaments, or exhibitions on any waters of this state. It shall adopt and may, from time to time, amend regulations concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and persons thereon, either observers or participants.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 62.